Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.445

Certain offers and announcements on securities prohibited.

Prior to completion of a conversion, no person may make any offer, or announcement of an offer or intent to make an offer, for any security of a converting savings bank issued or to be issued in connection with the conversion.

[ 1981 c 85 s 88.]